dictsource/kk_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Kazakh

.L04  б в г ғ д ж з к қ л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ  // consonants

.group а
        а        A
        а  (_   'A
        а  (L04_ 'A
        а  (L04L04 'A

.group ә
        ә        &
        ә  (_   '&
        ә  (L04_ '&
        ә  (L04L04 '&

.group б
        б        b
	
.group в
        в        v

.group г
        г        g

.group ғ
        ғ        G

.group д
        д        d

.group е
    _)  е        je
        е        e
        е  (_    'e
        е  (L04_ 'e
        е  (L04L04 'e

.group ё
        ё        jo
        ё  (_    j'o
        ё  (L04_ j'o
        ё  (L04L04 j'o

.group ж
        ж        Z;

.group з
        з        z

.group и
        и        @j
        и  (_   '@j
        и  (L04_ '@j
        и  (L04L04_ '@j

.group й
        й        j

.group к
        к        k

.group қ
        қ        q

.group л
        л        l

.group м
        м        m

.group н
        н        n

.group ң
        ң        N

.group о
        о        o
        о  (_    'o
        о  (L04_ 'o
        о  (L04L04 'o


.group ө
        ө        8
        ө  (_   '8
        ө  (L04_ '8
        ө  (L04L04_ '8

.group п
        п        p

.group р
        р        *

.group с
        с        s

.group т
        т        t

.group у
        у        Uw
        у  (_   'Uw
        у  (L04_ 'Uw
        у  (L04L04_ 'Uw

.group ұ
        ұ        U
        ұ  (_   'U
        ұ  (L04_ 'U
        ұ  (L04L04 'U

.group ү
        ү        u#
        ү  (_   'u#
        ү  (L04_ 'u#
        ү  (L04L04_ 'u#

.group ф
        ф        f

.group х
        х        X

.group һ
        һ        h

.group ц
        ц        ts

.group ч
        ч        tS;

.group ш
        ш        S;

.group щ
        щ        S;tS;

.group ъ
        ъ        ?

.group ы
        ы        @
        ы  (_   '@
        ы  (L04_ '@
        ы  (L04L04_ '@

.group і
        і        I
        і  (_   'I
        і  (L04_ 'I
        і  (L04L04_ 'I

.group ь
        ь        ?

.group э
        э        E
        э  (_   'E
        э  (L04_ 'E
        э  (L04L04_ 'E

.group ю
        ю        jUw
        ю  (_    j'Uw
        ю  (L04_ j'Uw
        ю  (L04L04_ j'Uw

.group я
        я        jA
        я  (_    j'A
        я  (L04_ j'A
        я  (L04L04_ j'A
        
